Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB241.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 219. Expungement of Citations Regarding COVID-19 Protocols.--(a) Subject to subsection (b), a citation issued by the board or the enforcement bureau to a retail licensee for 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 failure of the retail licensee to comply with any of the following executive actions during the period in which the Governor's Proclamation of Disaster Emergency issued on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020) was in effect shall be expunged by the board or the enforcement bureau, as applicable:(1) A proclamation or order of the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(f)(7) (relating to general authority of Governor), s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, or section 5 of the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955, which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(2) An order of the Secretary of Health under s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) or 2106 of The Administrative Code of 1929, section 5 of the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955 or 28 Pa. Code § 27.60 (relating to disease control measures), 27.61 (relating to isolation), 27.65 (relating to quarantine), 27.66 (relating to placarding), 27.67 (relating to movement of persons and animals subject to isolation or quarantine by action of a local health authority or the Department) or 27.68 (relating to release from isolation or quarantine), which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(3) Guidance issued by the Department of Health or the 20250SB0241PN0194 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Human Services relating to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(b) If the board or enforcement bureau issued a citation to a retail licensee as described in subsection (a), the board or enforcement bureau, as applicable, shall:(1) expunge the citation, if the imposition of the citation was for a violation of executive action described in subsection (a) at no cost to the retail licensee within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph; and(2) provide notice of the expungement to the retail licensee.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Retail licensee" shall mean a person that holds a hotel license, a restaurant liquor license, an eating place retail dispenser license, a club license or a catering club license under this act.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0241PN0194 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718